Hawaii statutes.
[§171-172] Turtle Bay conservation easement
special fund. (a) There is established the Turtle Bay conservation
easement special fund to be administered by the department of land and natural
resources.

(b) Transient accommodations tax revenues
allocated to the Turtle Bay conservation easement special fund pursuant to
section 237D-6.5 and moneys from the land conservation fund shall be deposited
into the special fund. All interest earned on the moneys in the special fund
shall be credited to the special fund.

(c) Moneys in the Turtle Bay conservation
easement special fund shall be expended to reimburse the state general fund for
payment of debt service on reimbursable general obligation bonds issued to
acquire the conservation easement and other real property interests in Turtle
Bay, Oahu.

(d) The Turtle Bay conservation easement
special fund shall be exempt from the central service expenses of section 36-27
and departmental administrative expenses of section 36-30.

(e) Upon reimbursement to the state general
fund of all debt service on reimbursable general obligation bonds issued to
acquire the conservation easement in Turtle Bay, Oahu, any unencumbered and
unexpended moneys in the Turtle Bay conservation easement special fund shall be
transferred to the tourism special fund established under section 201B-11. [L
2015, c 121, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next